Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3825
Corporation; additional reports.

In addition to an annual statement, the director may require of corporations, under oath and in the form prescribed by the director, such additional regular or special reports as the director may deem necessary to the proper supervision of corporations under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 25.